Utah statutes.
53A-3-410.   Criminal background checks on school personnel -- Notice --
Payment of cost -- Request for review.
(1)  A school district superintendent or the superintendent's designee:
(a)  shall require a potential employee or a volunteer who will be given
significant unsupervised access to a student in connection with the
volunteer's assignment to submit to a criminal background check as a condition
for employment or appointment; and
(b)  where reasonable cause exists, may require an existing employee or
volunteer to submit to a criminal background check.
(2)  The chief administrative officer of a private school may require, and the
chief administrative officer of the private school that enrolls scholarship
students under Chapter 1a, Part 7, Carson Smith Scholarships for Students with
Special Needs Act, shall require:
(a)  a potential employee or volunteer to submit to a criminal background
check as a condition for employment or appointment; and
(b)  where reasonable cause exists, an existing employee or volunteer to
submit to a criminal background check.
(3)  The applicant, volunteer, or employee shall receive written notice that
the background check has been requested.
(4) (a) (i)  Fingerprints of the individual shall be taken, and the Criminal
Investigations and Technical Services Division of the Department of Public
Safety, established in Section 53-10-103, shall release the individual's full
record of criminal convictions to the administrator requesting the
information.
(ii)  The division shall maintain a separate file of fingerprints submitted
under Subsection (4)(a)(i) and notify the State Office of Education when a new
entry is made against a person whose fingerprints are held in the file
regarding:
(A)  any matters involving an alleged sexual offense;
(B)  any matters involving an alleged felony or class A misdemeanor drug
offense; or
(C)  any matters involving an alleged offense against the person under Title
76, Chapter 5, Offenses Against the Person.
(iii)  The cost of maintaining the separate file shall be paid by the State
Office of Education from fees charged to those submitting fingerprints.
(b)  Information received by the division from entities other than agencies or
political subdivisions of the state may not be released to a private school
unless the release is permissible under applicable laws or regulations of the
entity providing the information.
(5)  The superintendent, local school board, or their counterparts at a
private school shall consider only those convictions which are job-related for
the employee, applicant, or volunteer.
(6) (a)  The district or private school shall pay the cost of the background
check except as otherwise provided in Subsection (6)(b), and the monies
collected shall be credited to the Criminal Investigations and Technical
Services Division to offset its expenses.
(b)  The district or private school may require an applicant to pay the costs
of a background check as a condition for consideration for employment or
appointment, if:
(i)  the applicant:
(A)  has passed an initial review;
(B)  is one of a pool of no more than five candidates for a position; and
(C)  except as may be otherwise provided by state board rule for an applicant
who submitted to a background check while completing a higher education
program at a Utah institution of higher education, has not been the subject of
a criminal background check of similar scope during the preceding two years
that was requested by a potential employer or the State Board of Education;
and
(ii)  a copy of the background check is provided to the district or school
considering employment or appointment of the applicant.
(7)  The Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division shall, upon
request, seek additional information from regional or national criminal data
files in responding to inquiries under this section.
(8) (a)  A private school seeking information from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation or other national criminal data file which the private school
may not access directly shall submit its request to the Teacher Certification
Section of the State Board of Education, together with the required fee and
the school's criminal data-related criteria for limiting or rejecting
employment.
(b)  The section shall submit the request and, upon receiving the requested
information, shall determine whether the subject of the inquiry is entitled to
employment under the school's criteria.
(c)  The section shall disclose its determination to the school but may not
disclose the data in the national criminal data file.
(9) (a)  The applicant, volunteer, or employee shall have opportunity to
respond to any information received as a result of the background check.
(b)  A private school applicant, volunteer, or employee who wishes to respond
shall:
(i)  submit a request to the school; and
(ii)  give a written statement to the Teacher Certification Office authorizing
the office to release the background check information to a hearing officer
selected by the individual and the school.
(c)  The individual and the school shall equally share any costs incurred
under Subsection (9)(b).
(d)  A public agency shall resolve any request for review by an applicant,
volunteer, or employee seeking employment or employed by the agency through
normal administrative procedures established by the agency.
(10)  If a person is denied employment or is dismissed from employment because
of information obtained through a criminal background check, the person shall
receive written notice of the reasons for denial or dismissal and have an
opportunity to respond to the reasons under the procedures set forth in
Subsection (9).
(11)  Information obtained under this part is confidential and may only be
disclosed as provided in this section.
